Utah statutes.
39-6-59.   Military court sentence -- Execution by convening authority.
(1)  Except under Sections 39-6-17 and 39-6-58, a military court sentence may
be ordered executed by the convening authority when approved by him, unless
suspended or deferred.
(2)  The convening authority shall, in his discretion, approve the sentence or
the part or commuted form of the sentence.  After his approval, he may suspend
the execution of the sentence.
